Homework/HW3/2.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N  +PastPart +Past +PresPart +3P +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root

Noun ;

LEXICON Noun

cat     Ninf;
torch   Ninf;
ally    Ninf;
play    Ninf;
goose   Ninf;
formula Ninf;



LEXICON Ninf

+N+Sg:0   #;
+N+Pl:^s  #;
